New Jersey, session 222, A4455.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Department of Veterans Affairs shall be permitted to accept moneys received by the department as gifts, grants, or donations from the public and private sectors for the purpose of public service announcements for the prevention of veteran suicide. Moneys received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into a special nonlapsing fund maintained by the State Treasurer.  Moneys credited to such account shall be appropriated solely to fund public service announcements for the prevention of veteran suicide. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.